Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 5. Judicial Department
§ 6. Commission on judicial conduct and ethics.

There is hereby created the Commission on Judicial Conduct and Ethics. The commission shall have twelve (12) members who reside in Wyoming consisting of:

Three (3) active Wyoming judges, who are not members of the supreme court, elected by the full-time, active Wyoming judges;

Three (3) members of the Wyoming state bar, appointed by its governing body; and

Six (6) electors of the state, who are not active or retired judges or attorneys, appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate.

All terms shall be for three (3) years duration. Members shall be eligible for reappointment to a second term.

The commission shall divide itself into investigatory and adjudicatory panels for each case considered. No commission member may serve on an adjudicatory panel in any case in which that member served in an investigatory capacity.

The commission, or a panel thereof, shall consider complaints of judicial misconduct made against judicial officers and, to the extent permitted and as provided for by the code of judicial conduct, may:

Discipline a judicial officer; or

Recommend discipline of a judicial officer to the supreme court or a special supreme court.

The supreme court shall adopt a code of judicial conduct applicable to all judicial officers and adopt rules governing:

The election of judges to the commission;

The staggering of terms, and the removal and filling of vacancies of commission members;

The appointment of a special supreme court composed of five (5) district judges who are not members of the commission, to act in the place of the supreme court in any case involving the discipline or disability of a justice of the supreme court; and

Procedures for the operation of the commission including exercise of the commission's disciplinary powers.

The supreme court or special supreme court, on recommendation of the commission or on its own motion may:

Suspend a judicial officer without salary when the judicial officer is charged with or is convicted in the United States of a crime punishable as a felony or one involving moral turpitude under Wyoming or federal law, and remove that judicial officer in the event such conviction becomes final;

For any judicial officer removed from office, order a forfeiture of any pension or retirement benefits accrued after the offending conduct, except for those that have been vested under the Wyoming retirement act or any local plan;

Suspend the judicial officer from practicing law in this state; and

Remove a judicial officer from office or impose other discipline permitted by the rules for judicial discipline for conduct that constitutes willful misconduct in office, or for a willful and persistent failure to perform the duties of the office, or for habitual intemperance, or for conduct prejudicial to the administration of justice that brings the judicial office into disrepute, or for a violation of the code of judicial conduct.

The code of judicial conduct shall provide for the mandatory retirement of a judicial officer for any disability that seriously interferes with the performance of the duties of the office and is, or is likely to become, permanent. A judicial officer retired by the supreme court or a special supreme court for a disability shall be considered to have retired voluntarily without loss of retirement benefits.

A judicial officer removed from office is ineligible for any judicial office.

This section applies to all judicial officers during their service on the bench and to former judicial officers regarding allegations of judicial misconduct occurring during service on the bench if a complaint is made within one (1) year following service. The term “judicial officer” includes all members of the judicial branch of government performing judicial functions. (As amended by Laws 1917, ch. 115; Laws 1971, House Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 719; Laws 1996, House Joint Resolution No. 3, § 1.)

Cross references. —

For additional provision concerning judicial supervisory commission, see §

5-1-103

.

Amendment. —

Laws 1996, House Joint Resolution No. 3, § 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment of this section, which was adopted by vote of the people at the general election held November 5, 1996, and was proclaimed in effect November 18, 1996.

The 1996 amendment rewrote the section, which formerly provided for a judicial supervisory commission.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appeared in the printed acts.

“Conduct prejudicial to administration of justice that brings judicial office into disrepute”

is conduct which includes certain personal activities outside the judicial office. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Judicial Merit Retention in Wyoming: An Analysis and Some Suggestions for Reform,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1980).

For article, “Ousting the Judge: Campaign Politics in the 1984 Wyoming Judicial Retention Elections,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 371 (1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Confidentiality of proceedings or reports of judicial inquiry board or commission, 5 ALR4th 730.

§ 7. Supreme court generally; terms of court.

At least two terms of the supreme court shall be held annually at the seat of government at such times as may be provided by law.

Cross references. —

As to regular term of court, see §

5-2-101

.

As to special terms of court, see §§

5-2-103

to

5-2-105

.

§ 8. Supreme court generally; qualifications of justices.

No person shall be eligible to the office of justice of the supreme court unless he be learned in the law, have been in actual practice at least nine (9) years, or whose service on the bench of any court of record, when added to the time he may have practiced law, shall be equal to nine (9) years, be at least thirty years of age and a citizen of the United States, nor unless he shall have resided in this state or territory at least three years.

Cross references. —

For another provision as to qualification of supreme court justices, see §

5-1-101

.

As to filling of vacancies by governor, see §

22-18-110

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of age requirement for state public office, 90 ALR3d 900.

§ 9. Supreme court generally; clerk.

There shall be a clerk of the supreme court who shall be appointed by the justices of said court and shall hold his office during their pleasure, and whose duties and emoluments shall be as provided by law.

Cross references. —

As to clerk of supreme court generally, see §§

5-2-201

to

5-2-204

.

As to deputy clerk of supreme court, see §§

5-2-205

to

5-2-207

.

As to clerks of court generally, see ch. 7 of title 5.

For amount of salary of clerk and deputy clerk of supreme court, see §

9-3-101

.

§ 10. District courts generally; jurisdiction.

The district court shall have original jurisdiction of all causes both at law and in equity and in all criminal cases, of all matters of probate and insolvency and of such special cases and proceedings as are not otherwise provided for. The district court shall also have original jurisdiction in all cases and of all proceedings in which jurisdiction shall not have been by law vested exclusively in some other court; and said court shall have the power of naturalization and to issue papers therefor. They shall have such appellate jurisdiction in cases arising in justices' and other inferior courts in their respective counties as may be prescribed by law. Said courts and their judges shall have power to issue writs of mandamus, quo warranto, review, certiorari, prohibition, injunction and writs of habeas corpus, on petition by or on behalf of any person in actual custody in their respective districts.

Cross references. —

As to reservation of difficult constitutional questions to the supreme court, see §

1-13-101

.

As to district courts generally, see ch. 3 of title 5.

As to establishment of circuit courts, see §

5-9-102

.

For rules concerning operation of district courts and duties of clerks thereof, see Rules 77 to 80, W.R.C.P.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 9, effective July 1, 2000, provides: “On and after the effective date of this act, each circuit court shall consist of the county courts geographically located within a judicial district in existence on the effective date of this act. All judicial business pending before any county court shall be considered to be pending before the circuit court, and the circuit court judges shall in all respects be the judicial successors in office of all the county court judges and county courts of the county. All judicial files, records, and dockets belonging to or appertaining to the office of the county court judges and county courts of the counties shall be filed in the appropriate office of the circuit court and safely kept therein, or may be stored and shall in all respects constitute records of the circuit court.”

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 10, provides: “On and after the effective date of this act, a county court judge holding office on the effective date of this act shall become a circuit court judge of the circuit court in the judicial district in which he was a county court judge and shall perform the duties of a circuit court judge as provided in this act. The term of office of a circuit court judge who holds that office under this section shall expire on the date his term of office as a county court judge would have expired. He shall be considered an incumbent in the office of circuit court judge, and thus, he shall stand for retention in office as circuit court judge.”

Jurisdiction over sex offender registration requirement. —

District court erred in finding that it lacked subject matter jurisdiction to enter an order terminating petitioner’s duty to register as a sex offender given its original jurisdiction under Wyo. Const. art. V, § 10, and its jurisdiction over claims under the Wyoming Sex Offender Registration Act. Gunsch v. State, 2019 WY 79, 444 P.3d 1278,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2019).

Term “district court” is used in a broad or inclusive sense

as if there were 1 district court in a given judicial district for several counties, and as if there were 1 district court in a given county for the several jurisdictions such as civil, criminal and probate. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963); In re Estate of Scott, 657 P.2d 361,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 275

(Wyo. 1983).

Certiorari invoked where counsel files late appeal. —

The district court improperly dismissed a criminal appeal from the county court because the notice of appeal was not filed on time. The case was remanded to the district court for an evidentiary hearing to determine if fault for the late notice of appeal was that of the defendant or of his counsel, with instructions that, if the court found that the fault was attributable to counsel, it could invoke the common-law writ of certiorari pursuant to this section. Foote v. State, 751 P.2d 884,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1988).

District courts are courts of general jurisdiction.

Murrell v. Stock Growers' Nat'l Bank, 74 F.2d 827, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4018 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

District courts are courts of superior and general jurisdiction and administer all law — the common law, statutory law, and principles of equity, all in the same suit. Urbach v. Urbach, 52 Wyo. 207, 73 P.2d 953,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1937).

Jurisdiction over worker's compensation matters. —

District courts are courts of general jurisdiction, and this jurisdiction includes jurisdiction over worker's compensation claims and disputes. Larsen v. Hall Constr. Co., 770 P.2d 1089,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1989).

No aggregation of class action claims. —

In a class action lawsuit, the claim of each and every plaintiff, whether named or unnamed, must meet the minimum jurisdictional limit, and aggregation of claims for that purpose is not permitted. Mutual of Omaha Ins. Co. v. Blury-Losolla, 952 P.2d 1117,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1998), reh'g denied,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. Feb. 17, 1998).

District courts have jurisdiction of all criminal cases except those for which other provision is made.

Fuller v. State, 568 P.2d 900,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1977).

Birth certificate amendments.—

District court erred in concluding that it lacked subject matter jurisdiction over a petition for an order recognizing petitioner’s change of sex and gender where it applied a presumption against district court jurisdiction, when Wyo. Const. art. 5, § 10, required a presumption in favor of jurisdiction, and Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-1-424(c) merely identified, and imposed requirements for, one type of vital records amendment, and as such, it did not affect district court jurisdiction. Moreover, the legislature had expressed no clear intention to limit the district court’s jurisdiction to amend birth certificates under the Vital Records Act, and agency regulations allowing amendment of a person’s sex on her birth certificate did not modify, dilute, or change in any way the statutory provisions from which the Wyoming Department of Health derived its authority. MH v. First Judicial Dist. Court of Laramie Cty., 2020 WY 72, 465 P.3d 405,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 2020).

Subject-matter jurisdiction defined. —

Subject-matter jurisdiction is “the power to hear and determine cases of the general class to which the proceedings in question belong.” Fuller v. State, 568 P.2d 900,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1977).

Subject matter jurisdiction determined from the face of the charging documents. —

Where the charging documents alleged that offense was defendant's third family violence offense, making the offense a felony and bringing into play the enhancement provision of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-501(f)(ii), applying the rule that subject matter jurisdiction is determined from the face of the charging documents, the district court had subject matter jurisdiction over the felony offense because the charging documents alleged elements constituting a felony. Messer v. State, 2004 WY 98, 96 P.3d 12,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2004).

Filing of amended information is procedural matter,

not one of jurisdiction. Fuller v. State, 568 P.2d 900,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 310

(Wyo. 1977).

County cannot sue state in absence of specific constitutional or statutory provision

authorizing such an action. State v. Board of County Comm'rs, 642 P.2d 456,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1982).

Alleged unconstitutional zoning ordinance presents justiciable controversy. —

An action seeking a declaratory judgment that a zoning ordinance imposing height limitations for trees effected an unconstitutional taking, brought by a landowner who was notified that a tree on his property was not in conformance with the ordinance, presented a justiciable controversy, even though the landowner failed to seek a variance before filing his action. Rogers v. Cheyenne, 747 P.2d 1137,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 570

(Wyo. 1987).

Petitions in error from justices' courts. —

The district court may consider a petition in error from a justice's court. Clendenning v. Guise, 8 Wyo. 91, 55 P. 447,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 1898).

Administrative remedies exhaustion constitutional. —

Given that the Wyoming constitution specifically recognizes and allows the vesting of jurisdiction in entities other than the district courts, and that the legislature properly placed jurisdiction over state personnel matters with the department of administration and information, the district court's jurisdiction was not unconstitutionally limited by requiring a state employee to exhaust his administrative remedies before seeking relief from the district court. Glover v. State, 860 P.2d 1169,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 162

(Wyo. 1993).

Appeal from board of adjustment. —

Board of adjustment under a zoning ordinance exercises both administrative and quasi judicial functions; and the legislature could properly authorize an “appeal” to the district court to correct its actions. In re McInerney, 47 Wyo. 258, 34 P.2d 35,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1934).

District courts are without jurisdiction over appeals from board of land commissioners

unless within provisions of governing statute. State ex rel. Walls v. District Court, 38 Wyo. 427, 267 P. 1060,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1928).

Forfeiture proceedings. —

Circuit courts do not have jurisdiction over forfeiture proceedings. The district court had general jurisdiction over this civil forfeiture proceeding. Orosco v. Wyoming (In re United States Currency Totaling $14,245.00), 2022 WY 15, 503 P.3d 51,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2022).

Probate matters. —

District courts have exclusive jurisdiction in probate matters. Rice v. Tilton, 14 Wyo. 101, 82 P. 577,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1905).

The territorial probate court and the office of judge thereof was abolished by the adoption of the constitution. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

The probate court is an arm of the district court and any distinction between probate courts and district courts is more technical than real. In re Estate of Lonquest, 526 P.2d 994,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1974).

While in this state the district court is the court of general jurisdiction, and the same court has by this section jurisdiction of all matters of probate, yet, in the exercise of its probate powers, its jurisdiction is limited and special, and when its acts in probate are without or beyond the limits of the special jurisdiction conferred they have no binding effect even upon those who have invoked its authority. In re Estate of Stringer, 80 Wyo. 426, 345 P.2d 786,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1959); In re Estate of Frederick, 599 P.2d 550,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 442

(Wyo. 1979); In re Estate of Blaney, 607 P.2d 354,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1980).

Presumption of regularity of proceedings of the district court applies to proceedings in probate matters. Lethbridge v. Lauder, 13 Wyo. 9, 76 P. 682,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1904).

District court, in view of constitution and statutory provisions, has power and jurisdiction in all matters of probate, and jurisdiction to order that retail store owned by decedent be kept open during period of administration, and that his administratrix be allowed fee for extra-ordinary service in management thereof. In re Austin's Estate, 37 Wyo. 313, 261 P. 130,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1927).

Where a nonresident died within the state, leaving personal property, the district court of the county where she died, leaving property therein, had jurisdiction to grant administration of her estate. Bliler v. Boswell, 9 Wyo. 57, 59 P. 798,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 9 Wyo. 57, 59 P. 798,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1900).

Wyoming district court had jurisdiction to redetermine rights of parties determined by a decree of distribution, rights under will not determined by such decree, rights of life tenants, and right to give mortgage or trust deed to secure improvements loan. Murrell v. Stock Growers' Nat'l Bank, 74 F.2d 827, 1934 U.S. App. LEXIS 4018 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1934).

In proceedings under statute, for approval of executor's final report and in proceedings for distribution, the probate jurisdiction of the district court, granted by this section, does not include power to determine the priority of conflicting assignments of a legatee's interest in the estate. Church v. Quiner, 31 Wyo. 222, 224 P. 1073,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1924).

Although it is more regular and desirable that an action for declaratory judgment be initiated in the district court under the usual civil procedures, there would seem to be no prohibition or valid objection to an action seeking a declaration of heirship being initiated by the district court in its probate arm. In re Estate of Lonquest, 526 P.2d 994,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 235

(Wyo. 1974).

The probate court cannot render judgment against a debtor of the deceased on a debt alleged to have been incurred prior to the death. If such debt is not paid, the executor must bring the action for collection in the district court proper. If the action is successful, the proper judgment will issue out of the district court. In re Estate of Scott, 642 P.2d 1287,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 319

(Wyo. 1982).

Trust administration. —

When irregularities were alleged regarding a trustee's intervention in certain litigation, the district court was not deprived of jurisdiction to enter orders after the intervention; the jurisdiction of the district courts is defined by art. 5, § 10, Wyo. Const., and it has plenary jurisdiction over trust administration, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

4-10-203

. Woods v. Wells Fargo Bank, 2004 WY 61, 90 P.3d 724,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. June 22, 2004).

Administrator's replevin action in district not probate court. —

The district court, and not the district court sitting as the probate court, is the proper forum for an administrator to bring a replevin action. In re Estate of Blaney, 607 P.2d 354,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 244

(Wyo. 1980).

Action against surety. —

District court had jurisdiction of an action against a surety on a guardian's bond given in another state. United States Fidelity & Guar. Co. v. Parker, 20 Wyo. 29, 121 P. 531,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1912).

Eminent domain. —

Act authorizing city to condemn land within or without the corporate limits is not violative of this provision of the constitution. Edwards v. Cheyenne, 19 Wyo. 110, 114 P. 677,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1911), reh'g denied, 19 Wyo. 110, 122 P. 900,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1912).

Recovery of real property. —

In landlord's action to recover possession of property on ground of condition broken, lease providing for a forfeiture, district court had jurisdiction. Allen v. Houn, 30 Wyo. 186, 219 P. 573,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1923).

Custody of infants. —

District courts have unqualified jurisdiction to issue habeas corpus writs for the custody of infants. Tytler v. Tytler, 15 Wyo. 319, 89 P. 1,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1907).

Person illegally confined in insane asylum. —

Statute, providing a proceeding in the original court of commitment whereby one who has been adjudged insane, and who is alleged to have been restored to his right mind may have his restoration to capacity adjudged, does not divest the courts of jurisdiction to issue writs of habeas corpus in behalf of those illegally confined to an insane asylum. Byers v. Solier, 16 Wyo. 232, 93 P. 59,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1907).

District courts have jurisdiction to issue mandamus.

State ex rel. School Dist. v. Clay, 3 Wyo. 393, 31 P. 409,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1890).

Mandamus lies against all state officers. —

The power of the courts to compel “all state officers” to perform their duties is recognized in this section and § 3 of this article, which confer jurisdiction upon the courts in mandamus as to such officers. State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1963).

Quo warranto to contest the election of the district judge

should be filed in the district court, the judge, being disqualified, would be obliged to call in another judge and his refusal to do so would be ground for an appropriate proceeding in the supreme court to compel him. State ex rel. Walton v. Christmas, 48 Wyo. 239, 44 P.2d 905,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1935).

Challenging jurisdiction of court. —

One charged with grand larceny cannot question jurisdiction of the court on ground that his arrest within the state was effected by means of his abduction from another state, although it was done by the deputy sheriff and others, acting on advice of the prosecuting attorney. Kingen v. Kelley, 3 Wyo. 566, 28 P. 36,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1891).

Concurrent criminal contempt jurisdiction. —

Juvenile court criminal contempt jurisdiction was concurrent with district courts because (1) the legislative grant of jurisdiction to juvenile courts did not use the terms “exclusive” or “concurrent,” (2) Wyo. Const. art. 5, § 10 granted district courts general criminal jurisdiction, and (3) juvenile court jurisdiction was to be strictly construed. Brown v. State, 2017 WY 45, 393 P.3d 1265,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2017).

Inquiry into jurisdictional matters. —

One of the provisos of habeas corpus proceedings is to inquire into jurisdictional matters. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

But denial of petition nonappealable determination. —

Normally, a person may petition for a writ of habeas corpus again and again to the same or other courts, each denial thereof being a nonappealable determination. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Filing of writ in supreme court in restraint cases. —

A writ of habeas corpus in all restraint cases, including child-custody cases, may be filed in the supreme court of Wyoming although the issuance of a similar writ may have been refused by a district court. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Termination of parental rights. —

District court had jurisdiction to terminate parental rights because the district court had jurisdiction over the parents’ separate termination of parental rights proceedings and the Wyoming Department of Family Services was an agency authorized to file a termination of parental rights action. Hood v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In re JPL), 2021 WY 94, 493 P.3d 174,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2021).

Distribution of settlement funds. —

District court did not abuse its discretion when it awarded a limited liability company’s (LLC) attorneys a portion of a settlement fund because the district court’s adoption of a first come, first serve method for the disbursement of the LLC’s share of the settlement funds was not inequitable under the circumstance; the district court looked to its equitable powers to oversee the distribution of the money the clerk held. Mantle v. N. Star Energy & Constr. LLC, 2019 WY 54, 441 P.3d 841,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2019).

Authority to intervene with execution sale of federal judgment. —

Although the trial judge's statement that he did not think he had the authority to intervene with the execution sale of a federal judgment — which was purchased for $250 then settled for $80,000 — may have been error, since district courts have the equitable power to restrain execution upon a judgment which would result in an injustice, such error was rendered harmless by the judge's subsequent written order which found that the value of the judgment was unknown beyond the amount realized at the execution sale and that the eventual settlement amount received was the result of an increase in value after its execution sale. Wheatland Cold Storage & Meat Processing v. Wilkins, 705 P.2d 316,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 544

(Wyo. 1985).

Landowners presented a justiciable controversy in filing their complaint seeking a declaratory judgment to settle their rights to water use under their contracts with the town; the case was one of contract construction, not the construction of any right to use water under a permit and appropriation system. Barber v. City of Douglas, 931 P.2d 948,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1997).

Applied

in

Call v. Afton, 73 Wyo. 271, 278 P.2d 270,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1954);
Thomas v. Justice Court, 538 P.2d 42,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1975);
Gillis v. F & A Enters., 934 P.2d 1253,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 1997); Balderson v. State, 2013 WY 107, 309 P.3d 809,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 112

(Sept 17, 2013); Best v. Best, 2015 WY 133,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Sept. 30, 2015).

Quoted

in

Davidek v. Wyoming Inv. Co., 77 Wyo. 141, 308 P.2d 941,

1957 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1957); Joslyn v. Professional Realty, 622 P.2d 1369,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 282

(Wyo. 1981); Cotton v. Brow, 903 P.2d 530,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1995); Hamill v. Ferguson, 937 F. Supp. 1517, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17115 (D. Wyo. 1996); Cheyenne Publ., LLC v. Starostka, 2004 WY 88, 94 P.3d 463,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(2004).

Stated

in

Grable v. State, 649 P.2d 663,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 371

(Wyo. 1982); Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984); State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985); Simons v. Laramie County Sch. Dist., 741 P.2d 1116,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 496

(Wyo. 1987).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(1892); Stutsman v. City of Cheyenne, 18 Wyo. 499, 113 P. 322,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(1911); United States Fidelity & Guar. Co. v. Nash, 20 Wyo. 65, 121 P. 541,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1912); State ex rel. George v. Hull, 65 Wyo. 251, 199 P.2d 832,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(1948); State ex rel. Wyo. Farm Loan Bd. v. Herschler, 622 P.2d 1378,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 285

(Wyo. 1981); V-1 Oil Co. v. Ranck, 767 P.2d 612,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1989); Condict v. Lehman, 837 P.2d 81,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1992); Parkhurst v. Shillinger, 128 F.3d 1366,

1997 U.S. App. LEXIS 29095

(10th Cir. 1997); Jessen v. Burry, 13 P.3d 1118,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 227

(Wyo. 2000); BP Am. Prod. Co. v. Madsen, 2002 WY 135, 53 P.3d 1088,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Probate Procedure — Distinctions Between the Probate and Civil Arms of the District Courts,” see 19 Wyo. L.J. 241 (1965).

For article, “Wyoming's Law of Decedents' Estates, Guardianship and Trusts: A Comparison with the Uniform Probate Code — Part II,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1973).

For comment, “The Wyoming Juvenile Court Act of 1971,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 237 (1973).

For note, “Constitutional Law — Due Process — Replevin —
Right to Notice and Hearing Prior to Deprivation of Property. Fuentes v. Shevin, 407 U.S. 67, 32 L. Ed. 2d 556, 92 S. Ct. 1983, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 42 (1972),” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 315 (1973).

For comment, “Procedural Considerations in the Judicial Determination of Water Disputes,” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1974).

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

For comment, “Prosecution as a Juvenile or an Adult? Is the Discretion Vested in the District Attorney by Section 14-6-203(c) of the Wyoming Statutes Unconstitutional and Violative of the Proper Role of a Prosecutor?” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 187 (1984).

For comment, “How to Enforce a Money Judgment in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 645 (1985).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes such discriminatory prosecution or enforcement of laws as to provide valid defense in state criminal proceeding, 95 ALR3d 280.

Appeal by state of order granting new trial in criminal case, 95 ALR3d 596.

Availability of writ of prohibition or similar remedy against acts of public prosecutor, 16 ALR4th 112.

Right of one governmental subdivision to sue another such subdivision for damages, 11 ALR5th 630.

Propriety of federal court injunction against suit in foreign country, 78 ALR Fed 831.

Civil actions removable from state court to federal court under 28 U.S.C. § 1443, 159 ALR Fed 377.

§ 11. District courts generally; judges to hold court for each other.

The judges of the district courts may hold courts for each other and shall do so when required by law.

Cross references. —

For provision authorizing judges to hold court for each other in connection with probate matters, see §

2-2-109

.

As to holding court for each other generally, see §

5-3-106

.

As to assignment of judge to another district in case of emergency, see §

5-3-107

.

As to expenses of judges when acting in another district, see §

5-3-109

.

This section is self-executing

and confers authority on judge of one district to call in judge of another district without reference to statute, and independent of request or reason for substitution. Hoglan v. Geddes, 25 Wyo. 436, 172 P. 136,

1918 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1918).

This provision is self-executing and allows district judges to sit for each other whenever necessary. Tilley v. State, 912 P.2d 1140,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1996).

Power of the legislature to change the boundaries of judicial districts is not restricted

by the provision of the constitution that judges may or shall hold court for each other. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

Where an affidavit of prejudice is filed against a judge,

he is divested of all jurisdiction except to make the order of transfer. Huhn v. Quinn, 21 Wyo. 51, 128 P. 514,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1912).

Difference in convening and presiding judge. —

Fact that judge of the district court in which trial took place presided at the convening of court on the day trial began, but that the trial was presided over by the judge of another district, by request, does not render trial illegal, where it is not shown that there was another court held at the same time. Ross v. State, 8 Wyo. 351, 57 P. 924,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1899).

Cited

in

In re Fourth Judicial Dist., 4 Wyo. 133, 32 P. 850,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(1893); Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 12. District courts generally; qualifications of judges.

No person shall be eligible to the office of judge of the district court unless he be learned in the law, be at least twenty-eight years of age, and a citizen of the United States, nor unless he shall have resided within the State or Territory of Wyoming at least two years next preceding his election.

Cross references. —

See also §

5-1-101

.

Where an affidavit of prejudice is filed against a judge,

he is divested of all jurisdiction except to make the order of transfer. Huhn v. Quinn, 21 Wyo. 51, 128 P. 514,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1912).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of age requirement for state public office, 90 ALR3d 900.

§ 13. District courts generally; clerks.

There shall be a clerk of the district court in each organized county in which a court is holden who shall be elected, or, in case of vacancy, appointed in such manner and with such duties and compensation as may be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

For provisions concerning clerks and deputy clerks of district courts, see §§

5-3-201

to

5-3-213

.

For provisions relative to clerks of court generally, see ch. 7 of title 5.

As to office hours of clerk, see Rule 77(c), W.R.C.P.

As to books and records kept by clerk, see Rule 79, W.R.C.P.

Law reviews. —

For note, “Constitutional Law — Due Process — Replevin —
Right to Notice and Hearing Prior to Deprivation of Property. Fuentes v. Shevin, 407 U.S. 67, 32 L. Ed. 2d 556, 92 S. Ct. 1983, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 42 (1972),” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 315 (1973).

§ 14. District courts generally; commissioners.

The legislature shall provide by law for the appointment by the several district courts of one or more district court commissioners (who shall be persons learned in the law) in each organized county in which a district court is holden, such commissioners shall have authority to perform such chamber business in the absence of the district judge from the county or upon his written statement filed with the papers, that it is improper for him to act, as may be prescribed by law, to take depositions and perform such other duties, and receive such compensation as shall be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

See also §§

5-3-301

to

5-3-312

.

As to magistrates of the circuit court, see §

5-9-201

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

2011 Original House Joint Resolution No. 1, proposing to amend the Wyoming Constitution to expand the authority of district court commissioners, provided as follows:

Section 1.
The following proposal to amend
Wyoming Constitution, Article 5, Section 14 is proposed for submission to the electors of the State of Wyoming at the next general election for approval or rejection to become valid as a part of the Constitution if ratified by a majority of the electors at the election:

Article 5, Section 14.
District courts generally; commissioners.

The legislature shall provide by law for the appointment by the several district courts of one or more district court commissioners (who shall be persons learned in the law) in each organized county in which a district court is holden, such commissioners shall have authority to perform such business as may be prescribed by law, to take depositions and perform such other duties, and receive such compensation as shall be prescribed by law.

Although the ballot measure received more “for” than “against” votes at the 2012 General Election, the measure failed because it did not receive a majority of the total ballots cast in the election.

Jurisdiction on merits where judge disqualified. —

A court commissioner had no jurisdiction to determine on the merits of the issues where the judge had been disqualified. Huhn v. Quinn, 21 Wyo. 51, 128 P. 514,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1912).

Court cannot delegate power to hear, try or determine case to court commissioner.

K.C. v. State, 771 P.2d 774,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1989).

District court afforded unwarranted deference to determinations by court commissioner

and expanded the role of the court commissioner beyond that envisioned by constitution and statute, where no part of the proceedings before the court commissioner was transcribed for review by the district court and the court's order modifying a divorce decree contained only the conclusions of the court commissioner. Gaines v. Doby, 773 P.2d 442,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1989).

Child support modification proceeding. —

Pursuant to this section and §

5-3-307

, an assignment to a court commissioner to take evidence and make findings in a child support modification proceeding is not improper, but the district court must be apprised of the evidence received and relied upon by the court commissioner in making his findings, and the district court must independently review the evidence and findings in making its decision, with such review being indicated on the record. Foster v. Foster, 768 P.2d 1038,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1989), reh'g denied,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. Mar. 2, 1989).

Commissioner may extend time for filing record on appeal.

Miller v. New York Oil Co., 32 Wyo. 483, 235 P. 323,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1925).

Quoted

in

Sandstrom v. Sandstrom, 880 P.2d 103,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1994).

Cited

in

Mau v. Stoner, 12 Wyo. 478, 76 P. 584,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1904).